Arkansas, session 2025, SB625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2503(11), concerning the definition of
"qualifying expenses" under the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program, is amended to read as follows:
(11) “Qualifying expenses” means expenses that include the
following:
(A)(i) For the 2023-2024 school year, “qualifying
expenses” shall include:
(a)(A) Tuition;
(b)(B) Fees;
(c)(C) The cost of testing under this subchapter;
(d)(D) The cost of required school uniforms, if any, at a
participating school; and
(E) Reasonable costs associated with co-curricular courses
in the fine arts, music, or STEM fields if the co-curricular course is
*TNL380*
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
offered by a public school within the state;
(e)(F) Expenses determined by a participating school to be
necessary for the education of a participating student and required to be
paid by a participating student who is enrolled in the participating school,
including without limitation expenses related to:
(1)(i) Supplies;
(2)(ii) Equipment; and
(3)(iii) Access to technology; and
(4) Services provided by or at the participating
school.;
(ii) “Qualifying expenses” shall not mean optional
expenses payable to a third party; and
(B) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year and each
year thereafter, “qualifying expenses” shall include those listed under
subdivision (11)(A) of this section and include the following:
(i)(G) Instructional materials required for either in-
person or virtual instruction provided by a participating service provider or
participating school;
(ii)(H) Instructional or tutoring services;
(iii)(I) Curriculum;
(iv)(J) Supplemental materials or supplies required by a
course of study for a particular content area;
(v)(K) Fees for:
(a)(i) Courses and associated examinations for
college credit; and
(b)(ii) Any examination related to postsecondary
educational institution admission;
(vi)(L) Fees for:
(a)(i) Courses and associated examinations for
career training; and
(b)(ii) Any examination required in order to obtain
an industry-based credential;
(vii)(M)(i) Educational services provided by a licensed or
accredited practitioner or participating service provider to a participating
student who is a student with a disability.
(ii) Educational services provided under subdivision
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
(11)(M)(i) of this section may be provided in a nontraditional setting that
has been recommended and approved by a licensed or accredited practitioner or
physician for a participating student who is a student with a disability;
(viii)(N) Fees for account management by participating
service providers;
(ix)(a)(O)(i) Technological devices used to meet a
participating student's educational needs, which shall not include:
(1)(a) A television;
(2)(b) A video game console or accessory; or
(3)(c) Home theater or audio equipment; or
(d) A telephone, cell phone, or other
communication device unless the telephone, cell phone, or other communication
device is for a student with a disability who is unable to communicate
through other means or is required as part of an academic modification as
specified by a clinician.
(b)(ii) Technological devices under subdivision
(11)(B)(ix)(a) (11)(O)(i) of this section are subject to approval by the
Department of Education or a licensed physician;
(x) Costs (P) Reasonable costs, not to exceed twenty-five
percent (25%) of the funds allocated to a student's account in a fiscal year,
that are associated with transportation to and from a participating service
provider or participating school; and
(Q) Reasonable costs, not to exceed twenty-five percent
(25%) of the funds allocated to a student's account in a fiscal year, for
extracurricular activities, physical education activities, or educational
field trips that occur within the State of Arkansas; and
(xi)(R) Any other educational expense approved by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2503, concerning the definition of
"qualifying expenses" under the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as
follows:
(12) "Course" means a discrete program of study that follows a
predetermined syllabus or specification;
(13) "Completed student application" means:
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
(A) A fully finished online application that includes all
required fields completed and all applicable documentation attached to the
application for the Department of Education to determine the potential award
status of an applicant; or
(B) A fully finished paper application that:
(i) Includes all required fields completed and all
applicable documentation attached to the application for the department to
determine the potential award status of an applicant; and
(ii) Bears a postmark indicating that it was placed
in transit with the United States Postal Service or other common carrier
before the application deadline; and
(14) "School year" means the duration of school from July 1
through June 30.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2505(b)-(f), concerning account funds
under the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program, are
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) For the 2023-2024 school year, on On behalf of participating
students enrolled in participating schools or with participating service
providers and at the direction of a participating student’s parent, the
Department of Education shall make four (4) equal payments in quarterly
installments disbursements from the participating student’s account to the
participating school or participating service provider in which the
participating student is enrolled for tuition, fees, and costs associated
with testing and uniforms qualifying expenses.
(2) The department may:
(A) Contract with a vendor or provider to manage the
payment system used for purposes of implementing this subsection; and
(B) Withhold up to five percent (5%) of funds allocated
for each account annually for the administration of the Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program.
(c) For the 2023-2024 school year, if a participating student is
enrolled full-time in a participating school or with a participating service
provider and the total amount of tuition, fees, testing, and uniform costs is
less than the amount determined under subsection (a) of this section, the
amount allocated to the student shall be the lesser amount.
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
(d) Account funds shall:
(1)(A) Not be refunded, rebated, or shared with a parent or
participating student in any manner.
(B) Any refund or rebate for goods or services purchased
with account funds shall be credited directly to the participating student’s
account; and
(2) Be used only for qualifying education expenses for a
participating student.
(e)(1)(d)(1) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year and each year
thereafter, the The department shall develop a system for parents to direct
account funds to participating schools and participating service providers by
electronic funds transfer, automated clearinghouse transfer, debit card, or
another system.
(2) The department may:
(A) Contract with a vendor or provider, including without
limitation a private institution, to manage the payment system used for
purposes of implementing this subsection; and
(B) Withhold up to five percent (5%) Permit a vendor,
pursuant to contract, to withhold up to two percent (2%) of funds allocated
for each account annually for the administration of the Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program.
(3) The department shall:
(A) Not adopt a payment system under this subsection that
relies exclusively on requiring parents to be reimbursed for out-of-pocket
expenses; and
(B) Ensure a payment system developed under this
subsection provides maximum flexibility to parents by facilitating direct
payments to participating service providers and requests for preapproval of
and reimbursements for qualifying expenses.
(f)(1)(e)(1)(A) An account shall remain in force, and any unused funds
shall roll over from quarter-to-quarter and from year-to-year, until one (1)
or more of the following occurs:
(A)(i) A parent withdraws his or her participating student
from the program Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program;
(B)(ii) A participating student graduates from high
school; or
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
(C)(iii) The end of the school year if a participating
student turns twenty-one (21) years of age, whichever occurs first during the
school year;
(iv) A participating student is expelled from a
participating school; or
(v) A participating student is otherwise rendered
ineligible to participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program.
(B) If a participating student's account is closed
following the occurrence of an event under subdivision (e)(1)(A)(iv) or
(e)(1)(A)(v) of this section, the participating student's parent may appeal
the division's decision to close the participating student's account to the
state board according to rules promulgated by the state board.
(2) An account shall be closed before an event occurs under
subdivision (f)(1) (e)(1) of this section if the State Board of Education
finds:
(A) A substantial Evidence of intentional misuse of
account funds according to rules promulgated by the division; or
(B) That a parent has failed to comply with this
subchapter or state board rules governing the Arkansas Children’s Educational
Freedom Account Program.
(3)(A) Any unused funds shall revert to the division and be
allocated to fund other accounts.
(B) The division may pursue the collection of account
funds when evidence of intentional misuse of account funds according to rules
promulgated by the division has been shown through all means permitted by
law.
(B)(i)(C)(i) There shall be a maximum amount of funds
allowed to remain in each participating student's account.
(ii) The state board may establish rules to
determine the:
(a) Maximum amount of funds allowed under
subdivision (f)(3)(B)(i) (e)(3)(C)(i) of this section; and
(b) Process by which account funds will be
returned to the appropriate fund within the department.

04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2505, concerning account funds under
the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(k)(1)(A) The division shall provide a time frame for the submission
of applications under this subchapter that shall begin for the initial
application period no sooner than February 1 and finish no later than June 1
for an upcoming school year.
(B) The division shall promulgate rules for an applicant
who meets criteria established by the division and who submits an application
under this subchapter outside the time frame established by subdivision
(k)(1)(A) of this section, including without limitation an applicant who
moves:
(i) To this state from another state; or
(ii) From an area of this state that does not have a
participating school to an area of this state that does have a participating
school.
(2) At the time of submitting a completed student application,
an applicant shall indicate whether he or she will attend a private school or
file a notice of intent to home school.
(3) If an applicant changes from one (1) participating school to
another participating school, the applicant shall not be entitled to any
increase in funding under this subchapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2506 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-2506. Student eligibility — Initial and continuing.
(a) A Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a student is initially
eligible for an account if the student:
(1) Has a parent who is a resident of the State of Arkansas as
defined by § 6-18-202; and
(2) Is eligible to enroll in a public elementary or secondary
school in this state; and.
(3) Meets the following criteria:
(A)(i) For the 2023-2024 school year, a student shall be
eligible if the student is at least one (1) of the following:
(a) A student with a disability identified
under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
seq., as it existed on January 1, 2023;
(b) A student who is considered homeless under
the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2023;
(c) A foster child or a former foster child;
(d)(1) A student who is currently
participating in the Succeed Scholarship Program, § 6-41-901 et seq.
[repealed].
(2) A student who participated in the
Succeed Scholarship Program during the 2022-2023 school year and elects to
enroll in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program under
this subchapter shall receive one hundred percent (100%) of the prior year's
statewide foundation funding amount allotted per student under § 6-20-2305
until:
(A) The participating student
graduates from high school;
(B) The participating student
receives a certificate of completion; or
(C) An event that requires an
account to be closed under § 6-18-2505(f)(1) or § 6-18-2505(f)(2) occurs;
(e) A child of active-duty uniformed service
personnel, as identified under Title 10, Title 32, Title 33, or Title 42 of
the United States Code;
(f) A student who was enrolled in the previous
school year in a:
(1) Public school that has a rating of
“F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and State Board of Education rules; or
(2) Public school district classified as
in need of Level 5 — Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-2915; or
(g) A student who is enrolling in kindergarten
for the first time.
(ii)(a) For the 2023-2024 school year, a
maximum of one and five-tenths percent (1.5%) of the 2022-2023 total public
school student enrollment may be approved to participate in the Arkansas
Children's Educational Freedom Account Program.
(b) However, the number of students approved
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
to participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program
under subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(a) of this section shall not exceed the
amount of funds made available for the Arkansas Children's Educational
Freedom Account Program;
(B)(i) For the 2024-2025 school year, student eligibility shall
expand to include students who meet at least one (1) of the following:
(a) All students who are eligible under subdivision
(a)(3)(A) of this section;
(b) Students who were enrolled in the prior school
year in public schools rated “D” or “F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and
state board rules; and
(c) Students whose parents are:
(1) Veterans as identified under Title 38 of
the United States Code;
(2) In the uniformed service reserve
components;
(3) First responders; or
(4) Law enforcement officers.
(ii)(a) For the 2024-2025 school year, a maximum of
three percent (3%) of the 2022-2023 total public school student enrollment
may be approved to participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program.
(b) The number of students approved to participate
in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program under
subdivision (a)(3)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall:
(1) Include any students who are continuing to
participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program
from the 2023-2024 school year; and
(2) Not exceed the amount of funds made
available for the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program;
and
(C)(i) For the 2025-2026 school year and each year
thereafter, any resident of this state who is eligible to enroll in a public
elementary or secondary school shall be eligible.
(ii) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, there
shall be no limitation on student participation in the Arkansas Children's
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
Educational Freedom Account Program.
(b) In any year in which funds are insufficient to fund all
applications for new accounts, first priority shall be given to students who
are eligible under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section, followed by
students eligible under subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section Beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year and each year thereafter, for any year in which
funds are insufficient to fund all applications for new accounts under this
subchapter, priority shall be given according to the following schedule by
category first and then by submission time of a completed student
application:
(1) A student who participated in the Arkansas Children's
Educational Freedom Account Program during the previous school year;
(2) A student who participated in the Succeed Scholarship
Program during the 2022-2023 school year;
(3) A student with a disability identified under the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025;
(4) A student who is considered homeless under the McKinney-
Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025;
(5) A foster child;
(6) A student who was enrolled in the previous school year in a
public school that has a rating of "D" or "F" under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-
2106 and State Board of Education rules;
(7) A student whose parent is active-duty military, veterans
identified under Title 38 of the United States Code, or current or former
members of the Arkansas National Guard;
(8) A student who is or has a parent who is a law enforcement
officer;
(9) A student who is or has a parent who is a first responder;
(10) A student who is enrolling in kindergarten or first grade
for the first time; and
(11) Any other student for whom none of the categories under
subdivisions (b)(1)-(10) of this section is appliable.
(c) In any year in which funds are insufficient to fund all continuing
accounts, priority shall be given to students who have been in the Arkansas
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program the longest after priority has
been given to students identified under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The State Board of Education state board shall promulgate rules:
(1) For the implementation of the Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program; and
(2) To effectively and efficiently administer the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program, including without limitation:
(A) The awarding of funds to participating students;
(B) The oversight of the Arkansas Children’s Educational
Freedom Account Program; and
(C) Any other necessary aspects for the operation of the
Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program.
(e)(1)(d)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (e)(2) (d)(2) of
this section, a participating student may only participate in and receive
funds from one (1) of the following:
(A) The Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program established by this subchapter; or
(B) The Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program
Act, § 6-18-2301 et seq.
(2)(A) A student with a disability as described by subdivision
(a)(3)(A)(i)(a) (b)(3) of this section who has an annual family income that
is less than or equal to two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty
guidelines as determined annually in the Federal Register by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services under 42 U.S.C. § 9902(2), as
required under the Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program may
receive funds from both the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program established by this subchapter and the Philanthropic Investment in
Arkansas Kids Program.
(B) However, a student who qualifies under subdivision
(e)(2)(A) (d)(2)(A) of this section may receive funds from both the Arkansas
Children's Educational Freedom Account Program established by this subchapter
and the Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program only to the extent
necessary to cover qualifying expenses.
(f)(e) The student's parent shall submit an application for an account
to the Department of Education in accordance with Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program timelines established by the department
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
Department of Education.
(g)(1)(f)(1) The department Department of Education shall create a
standard form that a parent may submit to establish his or her child's
eligibility for the program Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program.
(2) The department Department of Education shall ensure that the
standard form required under subdivision (g)(1) (f)(1) of this section is
publicly available and may be submitted through various sources, including
without limitation the internet.
(h)(1)(g)(1) As part of the application, a parent shall sign an
agreement promising each of the following without limitation:
(A)(i) Not to enroll his or her child full-time in a
public school while his or her child is participating in the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program.
(ii) However, a participating student may take
approved courses at a public school participating as an approved provider;
(B) To use account funds only for qualifying expenses of
the participating student;
(C) To comply with all Arkansas Children’s Educational
Freedom Account Program requirements as established by the department
Department of Education according to state board rules; and
(D) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, in the case
of any account used for qualifying educational expenses not associated with
full-time enrollment in a participating school or a participating service
provider, to agree to provide an education for his or her participating
student in at least the subjects of English language arts, mathematics,
social studies, and science.
(2) The signed agreement required under subdivision (h)(1)
(g)(1) of this section shall satisfy the compulsory school attendance
requirements of § 6-18-201.
(i)(h) The division Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall:
(1) Continue making deposits into a participating student’s
account until:
(A) The division determines that the participating student
is no longer an eligible student;
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
(B) The division determines that there was substantial
evidence of intentional misuse of account funds, as defined by the state
board;
(C) A parent or a participating student withdraws from the
Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program;
(D) A participating student enrolls full-time in a public
school;
(E) A participating student graduates from high school; or
(F) A participating student completes the school year in
the year in which he or she turns twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(G) The division determines a parent or participating
student has committed fraudulent conduct;
(2) Provide parents with a written explanation of the:
(A) Allowable uses of funds;
(B) Responsibilities of parents; and
(C) Duties of the division and the role of any private
financial management firms or other private organizations that the department
Department of Education may contract with to administer the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program or any aspect of the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program; and
(3) Annually fund a participating student’s account as funds are
available and in accordance with this law and state board rules.
(j)(1)(i)(1) Upon notice to the division, a participating student may
choose to stop receiving funds disbursed under this subchapter and enroll
full-time in a public school.
(2)(A) Enrolling as a full-time student in a public school shall
result in the immediate suspension of payment of additional funds into the
participating student’s account.
(B)(i) However, for accounts that have been open for at
least one (1) full academic year, the account shall remain open and active
for the parent of a former participating student to make qualifying
expenditures to educate the student from funds remaining in the account.
(ii) When no funds remain in the former
participating student’s account, the division may close the account The
division shall close the participating student's account after the payment of
all liabilities incurred before the participating student enrolls full-time
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
in a public school.
(3)(A) If a former participating student decides to return to
the Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program and is a current
eligible student, payments into the former participating student’s existing
account may resume if the account is still open and active.
(B) A new account may be established if the a former
participating student’s previous account was closed for any reason other than
intentional misuse of account funds or fraudulent conduct.
(k)(j) The state board and the department Department of Education may
adopt rules to provide the least disruptive process for a participating
student who desires to stop receiving funds disbursed under this subchapter
and enroll full-time in a public school.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2507(a)(1)(B) and (C), concerning
private school eligibility requirements under the Arkansas Children's
Educational Freedom Account Program, are amended to read as follows:
(B) A private school shall no longer be eligible if:
(i) The private school has not received
accreditation within four (4) years of becoming eligible;
(ii) The state board Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education determines, based on information provided by the
accrediting association, that the private school is ineligible or unable to
continue the accreditation process; or
(iii) It becomes impossible for the private school to
obtain accreditation within four (4) years.
(C) A private school that becomes ineligible under this
section shall regain eligibility when the private school receives
accreditation and is approved by the state board meets all other requirements
established by law and rule as determined by the division;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2507(e) and (f), concerning Division
of Elementary and Secondary Education duties regarding eligibility for
participating schools and participating service providers under the Arkansas
Children's Educational Freedom Account Program, are amended to read as
follows:
(e) The department may bar a service provider from accepting payments
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
from accounts and restrict the service provider’s ability to serve additional
participating students if the department determines that the participating
service provider has:
(1) Failed to maintain continuing eligibility criteria
established by the state board;
(2) Demonstrated a gross or persistent lack of academic
competence or failure to provide services, as defined by the state board;
(3) Intentionally or substantially misrepresented information or
failed to refund any overpayments in a timely manner, as defined by the state
board; or
(4) Routinely failed to provide participating students with
promised educational goods or services, as defined by the state board; or
(5) Committed fraudulent conduct.
(f)(1) The department shall create procedures to ensure that a fair
process exists to determine whether a participating service provider may be
barred from receiving payments from accounts under subsection (e) of this
section.
(2) If the department bars a participating service provider from
receiving payments from accounts under this section, it shall notify parents
and participating students of its decision within three (3) business days of
its decision on the department's website and through attempted individual
communications.
(3) A participating service provider may appeal the department’s
decision to bar it from receiving payments from accounts to the state board.

SECTION 8. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability clause. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the timely implementation of
the proposed changes to the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program is integral to the provision of educational services in the State of
04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 H4/15/25 SB625
Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/B. Davis

























04-15-2025 09:22:03 TNL380